Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-724
Surety bond; requirements.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an applicant for a mortgage banker license or registration shall file with the department a surety bond in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars, furnished by a surety company authorized to do business in the State of Nebraska. The surety bond also shall cover all mortgage loan originators who are employees or independent agents of the applicant. The bond shall be for the use of the State of Nebraska and any Nebraska resident who may have claims or causes of action against the applicant or against an individual who is a mortgage loan originator employed by, or in an independent agent relationship with, the applicant. Submission of a rider to an existing bond indicating that the required coverage is outstanding and evidencing the beneficiaries required in this subsection shall satisfy the requirements of this section. The bond or a substitute bond shall remain in effect during all periods of licensing or registration.

(2) Upon filing of the mortgage report of condition required by section 45-726, a mortgage banker licensee or registrant shall maintain or increase its surety bond to reflect the total dollar amount of the closed residential mortgage loans originated or serviced in this state in the preceding calendar year in accordance with the following table. A licensee or registrant may decrease its surety bond in accordance with the following table if the surety bond required is less than the amount of the surety bond on file with the department.

Dollar Amount of Closed or ServicedResidential Mortgage LoansSurety Bond Required$0.00 to $5,000,000.00$100,000.00$5,000,000.01 to $10,000,000.00$125,000.00$10,000,000.01 to $25,000,000.00$150,000.00Over $25,000,000.00$200,000.00

(3) Should the department determine that a mortgage banker licensee or registrant does not maintain a surety bond in the amount required by subsection (2) of this section, the department shall give written notification to the mortgage banker licensee or registrant requiring him, her, or it to increase the surety bond within thirty days to the amount required by subsection (2) of this section.

(4) At any time the director may require the filing of a new or supplemental bond in the form as provided in subsection (1) of this section if he or she determines that the bond filed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section is exhausted or is inadequate for any reason, including the financial condition of the licensee, the registrant, or the applicant for a license or registration. The new or supplemental bond shall not exceed one million dollars.

Laws 1989, LB 272, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 217, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 218, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 31;

R.S.Supp.,2008, § 45-709;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 9;

Laws 2010, LB892, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB251, § 29.